Hawaii statutes.
§576B-312 Nondisclosure of
information in exceptional circumstances. If a party alleges in an
affidavit or a pleading under oath that the health, safety, or liberty of a
party or child would be jeopardized by disclosure of specific identifying
information, that information shall be sealed and shall not be disclosed to the
other party or the public. After a hearing in which a tribunal takes into
consideration the health, safety, or liberty of the party or child, the
tribunal may order disclosure of information that the tribunal determines to be
in the interest of justice. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next